Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.050

Co-guardian—Co-conservator.

(1) The court at any time may appoint a co-guardian or co-conservator to serve immediately or when a designated event occurs.

(2) A co-guardian or co-conservator appointed to serve immediately may act when that co-guardian or co-conservator complies with RCW 11.130.040.

(3) A co-guardian or co-conservator appointed to serve when a designated event occurs may act when:

(a) The event occurs; and

(b) That co-guardian or co-conservator complies with RCW 11.130.040.

(4) Unless an order of appointment under subsection (1) of this section or subsequent order states otherwise, co-guardians or co-conservators shall make decisions jointly.

[ 2019 c 437 s 110.]